Illinois, session 104th, HB3099.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearm Owners Identification Card Act is 5amended by changing Sections 1.1, 4, and 8 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 65/1.1)7    Sec. 1.1. For purposes of this Act:8    "Addicted to narcotics" means a person who has been:9        (1) convicted of an offense involving the use or 10    possession of cannabis, a controlled substance, or 11    methamphetamine within the past year; or12        (2) determined by the Illinois State Police to be 13    addicted to narcotics based upon federal law or federal 14    guidelines. 15    "Addicted to narcotics" does not include possession or use 16of a prescribed controlled substance under the direction and 17authority of a physician or other person authorized to 18prescribe the controlled substance when the controlled 19substance is used in the prescribed manner.20    "Adjudicated as a person with a mental disability" means 21the person is the subject of a determination by a court, board, 22commission or other lawful authority that the person, as a 23result of marked subnormal intelligence, or mental illness,   HB3099- 2 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1mental impairment, incompetency, condition, or disease:2        (1) presents a clear and present danger to himself, 3    herself, or to others;4        (2) lacks the mental capacity to manage his or her own 5    affairs or is adjudicated a person with a disability as 6    defined in Section 11a-2 of the Probate Act of 1975;7        (3) is not guilty in a criminal case by reason of 8    insanity, mental disease or defect;9        (3.5) is guilty but mentally ill, as provided in 10    Section 5-2-6 of the Unified Code of Corrections;11        (4) is incompetent to stand trial in a criminal case;12        (5) is not guilty by reason of lack of mental 13    responsibility under Articles 50a and 72b of the Uniform 14    Code of Military Justice, 10 U.S.C. 850a, 876b;15        (6) is a sexually violent person under subsection (f) 16    of Section 5 of the Sexually Violent Persons Commitment 17    Act; 18        (7) is a sexually dangerous person under the Sexually 19    Dangerous Persons Act;20        (8) is unfit to stand trial under the Juvenile Court 21    Act of 1987;22        (9) is not guilty by reason of insanity under the 23    Juvenile Court Act of 1987;24        (10) is subject to involuntary admission as an 25    inpatient as defined in Section 1-119 of the Mental Health 26    and Developmental Disabilities Code;  HB3099- 3 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1        (11) is subject to involuntary admission as an 2    outpatient as defined in Section 1-119.1 of the Mental 3    Health and Developmental Disabilities Code;4        (12) is subject to judicial admission as set forth in 5    Section 4-500 of the Mental Health and Developmental 6    Disabilities Code; or7        (13) is subject to the provisions of the Interstate 8    Agreements on Sexually Dangerous Persons Act. 9    "Clear and present danger" means a person who:10        (1) communicates a serious threat of physical violence 11    against a reasonably identifiable victim or poses a clear 12    and imminent risk of serious physical injury to himself, 13    herself, or another person as determined by a physician, 14    clinical psychologist, or qualified examiner; or15        (2) demonstrates threatening physical or verbal 16    behavior, such as violent, suicidal, or assaultive 17    threats, actions, or other behavior, as determined by a 18    physician, clinical psychologist, qualified examiner, 19    school administrator, or law enforcement official.20    "Clinical psychologist" has the meaning provided in 21Section 1-103 of the Mental Health and Developmental 22Disabilities Code.23    "Controlled substance" means a controlled substance or 24controlled substance analog as defined in the Illinois 25Controlled Substances Act. 26    "Counterfeit" means to copy or imitate, without legal   HB3099- 4 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1authority, with intent to deceive.2    "Developmental disability" means a severe, chronic 3disability of an individual that:4        (1) is attributable to a mental or physical impairment 5    or combination of mental and physical impairments;6        (2) is manifested before the individual attains age 7    22;8        (3) is likely to continue indefinitely;9        (4) results in substantial functional limitations in 3 10    or more of the following areas of major life activity:11            (A) Self-care. 12            (B) Receptive and expressive language. 13            (C) Learning. 14            (D) Mobility. 15            (E) Self-direction. 16            (F) Capacity for independent living. 17            (G) Economic self-sufficiency; and18        (5) reflects the individual's need for a combination 19    and sequence of special, interdisciplinary, or generic 20    services, individualized supports, or other forms of 21    assistance that are of lifelong or extended duration and 22    are individually planned and coordinated.23    "Federally licensed firearm dealer" means a person who is 24licensed as a federal firearms dealer under Section 923 of the 25federal Gun Control Act of 1968 (18 U.S.C. 923). 26    "Firearm" means any device, by whatever name known, which   HB3099- 5 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1is designed to expel a projectile or projectiles by the action 2of an explosion, expansion of gas or escape of gas; excluding, 3however:4        (1) any pneumatic gun, spring gun, paint ball gun, or 5    B-B gun which expels a single globular projectile not 6    exceeding .18 inch in diameter or which has a maximum 7    muzzle velocity of less than 700 feet per second;8        (1.1) any pneumatic gun, spring gun, paint ball gun, 9    or B-B gun which expels breakable paint balls containing 10    washable marking colors;11        (2) any device used exclusively for signaling or 12    safety and required or recommended by the United States 13    Coast Guard or the Interstate Commerce Commission;14        (3) any device used exclusively for the firing of stud 15    cartridges, explosive rivets or similar industrial 16    ammunition; and17        (4) an antique firearm (other than a machine-gun) 18    which, although designed as a weapon, the Illinois State 19    Police finds by reason of the date of its manufacture, 20    value, design, and other characteristics is primarily a 21    collector's item and is not likely to be used as a weapon.22    "Firearm ammunition" means any self-contained cartridge or 23shotgun shell, by whatever name known, which is designed to be 24used or adaptable to use in a firearm; excluding, however:25        (1) any ammunition exclusively designed for use with a 26    device used exclusively for signaling or safety and   HB3099- 6 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1    required or recommended by the United States Coast Guard 2    or the Interstate Commerce Commission; and3        (2) any ammunition designed exclusively for use with a 4    stud or rivet driver or other similar industrial 5    ammunition.6    "Forcible felony" has the meaning given in Section 2-8 of 7the Criminal Code of 2012.8    "Gun show" means an event or function:9        (1) at which the sale and transfer of firearms is the 10    regular and normal course of business and where 50 or more 11    firearms are displayed, offered, or exhibited for sale, 12    transfer, or exchange; or13        (2) at which not less than 10 gun show vendors 14    display, offer, or exhibit for sale, sell, transfer, or 15    exchange firearms. 16    "Gun show" includes the entire premises provided for an 17event or function, including parking areas for the event or 18function, that is sponsored to facilitate the purchase, sale, 19transfer, or exchange of firearms as described in this 20Section. Nothing in this definition shall be construed to 21exclude a gun show held in conjunction with competitive 22shooting events at the World Shooting Complex sanctioned by a 23national governing body in which the sale or transfer of 24firearms is authorized under subparagraph (5) of paragraph (g) 25of subsection (A) of Section 24-3 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 26    Unless otherwise expressly stated, "gun show" does not   HB3099- 7 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1include training or safety classes, competitive shooting 2events, such as rifle, shotgun, or handgun matches, trap, 3skeet, or sporting clays shoots, dinners, banquets, raffles, 4or any other event where the sale or transfer of firearms is 5not the primary course of business.6    "Gun show promoter" means a person who organizes or 7operates a gun show.8    "Gun show vendor" means a person who exhibits, sells, 9offers for sale, transfers, or exchanges any firearms at a gun 10show, regardless of whether the person arranges with a gun 11show promoter for a fixed location from which to exhibit, 12sell, offer for sale, transfer, or exchange any firearm.13    "Intellectual disability" means significantly subaverage 14general intellectual functioning, existing concurrently with 15deficits in adaptive behavior and manifested during the 16developmental period, which is defined as before the age of 1722, that adversely affects a child's educational performance.18    "Involuntarily admitted" has the meaning as prescribed in 19Sections 1-119 and 1-119.1 of the Mental Health and 20Developmental Disabilities Code. 21    "Mental health facility" means any licensed private 22hospital or hospital affiliate, institution, or facility, or 23part thereof, and any facility, or part thereof, operated by 24the State or a political subdivision thereof which provides 25treatment of persons with mental illness and includes all 26hospitals, institutions, clinics, evaluation facilities,   HB3099- 8 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1mental health centers, colleges, universities, long-term care 2facilities, and nursing homes, or parts thereof, which provide 3treatment of persons with mental illness whether or not the 4primary purpose is to provide treatment of persons with mental 5illness. 6    "National governing body" means a group of persons who 7adopt rules and formulate policy on behalf of a national 8firearm sporting organization. 9    "Noncitizen" means a person who is not a citizen of the 10United States, but is a person who is a foreign-born person who 11lives in the United States, has not been naturalized, and is 12still a citizen of a foreign country. 13    "Patient" means:14        (1) a person who is admitted as an inpatient or 15    resident of a public or private mental health facility for 16    mental health treatment under Chapter III of the Mental 17    Health and Developmental Disabilities Code as an informal 18    admission, a voluntary admission, a minor admission, an 19    emergency admission, or an involuntary admission, unless 20    the treatment was solely for an alcohol abuse disorder; or21        (2) a person who voluntarily or involuntarily receives 22    mental health treatment as an out-patient or is otherwise 23    provided services by a public or private mental health 24    facility and who poses a clear and present danger to 25    himself, herself, or others. 26    "Physician" has the meaning as defined in Section 1-120 of   HB3099- 9 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code.2    "Protective order" means any orders of protection issued 3under the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986, stalking no 4contact orders issued under the Stalking No Contact Order Act, 5civil no contact orders issued under the Civil No Contact 6Order Act, and firearms restraining orders issued under the 7Firearms Restraining Order Act or a substantially similar 8order issued by the court of another state, tribe, or United 9States territory or military judge.10    "Qualified examiner" has the meaning provided in Section 111-122 of the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 12Code.13    "Sanctioned competitive shooting event" means a shooting 14contest officially recognized by a national or state shooting 15sport association, and includes any sight-in or practice 16conducted in conjunction with the event. 17    "School administrator" means the person required to report 18under the School Administrator Reporting of Mental Health 19Clear and Present Danger Determinations Law.20    "Stun gun or taser" has the meaning ascribed to it in 21Section 24-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012.22(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 23102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-890, eff. 5-19-22; 102-972, eff. 241-1-23; 102-1030, eff. 5-27-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 25103-407, eff. 7-28-23.)   HB3099- 10 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1    (430 ILCS 65/4)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-4)2    Sec. 4. Application for Firearm Owner's Identification 3Cards. 4    (a) Each applicant for a Firearm Owner's Identification 5Card must: 6        (1) Submit an application as made available by the 7    Illinois State Police; and8        (2) Submit evidence to the Illinois State Police that:9            (i) This subparagraph (i) applies through the 10        180th day following July 12, 2019 (the effective date 11        of Public Act 101-80). He or she is 21 years of age or 12        over, or if he or she is under 21 years of age that he 13        or she has the written consent of his or her parent or 14        legal guardian to possess and acquire firearms and 15        firearm ammunition and that he or she has never been 16        convicted of a misdemeanor other than a traffic 17        offense or adjudged delinquent, provided, however, 18        that such parent or legal guardian is not an 19        individual prohibited from having a Firearm Owner's 20        Identification Card and files an affidavit with the 21        Department as prescribed by the Department stating 22        that he or she is not an individual prohibited from 23        having a Card;24            (i-5) This subparagraph (i-5) applies on and after 25        the 181st day following July 12, 2019 (the effective 26        date of Public Act 101-80). He or she is 21 years of   HB3099- 11 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1        age or over, or if he or she is under 21 years of age 2        that he or she has never been convicted of a 3        misdemeanor other than a traffic offense or adjudged 4        delinquent and is an active duty member of the United 5        States Armed Forces or the Illinois National Guard or 6        has the written consent of his or her parent or legal 7        guardian to possess and acquire firearms and firearm 8        ammunition, provided, however, that such parent or 9        legal guardian is not an individual prohibited from 10        having a Firearm Owner's Identification Card and files 11        an affidavit with the Illinois State Police as 12        prescribed by the Illinois State Police stating that 13        he or she is not an individual prohibited from having a 14        Card or the active duty member of the United States 15        Armed Forces or the Illinois National Guard under 21 16        years of age annually submits proof to the Illinois 17        State Police, in a manner prescribed by the Illinois 18        State Police; 19            (ii) He or she has not been convicted of a felony 20        under the laws of this or any other jurisdiction, 21        unless he or she has been granted a certificate of 22        relief from disabilities pursuant to subsections (g) 23        and (g-5) of Section 5-5.5-15 of the Unified Code of 24        Corrections, in which case he or she shall submit a 25        certified copy of the certificate of relief from 26        disabilities along with his or her application;  HB3099- 12 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1            (iii) He or she is not addicted to narcotics;2            (iv) He or she has not been a patient in a mental 3        health facility within the past 5 years or, if he or 4        she has been a patient in a mental health facility more 5        than 5 years ago submit the certification required 6        under subsection (u) of Section 8 of this Act;7            (v) He or she is not a person with an intellectual 8        disability;9            (vi) He or she is not a noncitizen who is 10        unlawfully present in the United States under the laws 11        of the United States;12            (vii) He or she is not subject to an existing order 13        of protection prohibiting him or her from possessing a 14        firearm;15            (viii) He or she has not been convicted within the 16        past 5 years of battery, assault, aggravated assault, 17        violation of an order of protection, or a 18        substantially similar offense in another jurisdiction, 19        in which a firearm was used or possessed;20            (ix) He or she has not been convicted of domestic 21        battery, aggravated domestic battery, or a 22        substantially similar offense in another jurisdiction 23        committed before, on or after January 1, 2012 (the 24        effective date of Public Act 97-158). If the applicant 25        knowingly and intelligently waives the right to have 26        an offense described in this clause (ix) tried by a   HB3099- 13 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1        jury, and by guilty plea or otherwise, results in a 2        conviction for an offense in which a domestic 3        relationship is not a required element of the offense 4        but in which a determination of the applicability of 5        18 U.S.C. 922(g)(9) is made under Section 112A-11.1 of 6        the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, an entry by the 7        court of a judgment of conviction for that offense 8        shall be grounds for denying the issuance of a Firearm 9        Owner's Identification Card under this Section;10            (x) (Blank);11            (xi) He or she is not a noncitizen who has been 12        admitted to the United States under a non-immigrant 13        visa (as that term is defined in Section 101(a)(26) of 14        the Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. 15        1101(a)(26))), or that he or she is a noncitizen who 16        has been lawfully admitted to the United States under 17        a non-immigrant visa if that noncitizen is:18                (1) admitted to the United States for lawful 19            hunting or sporting purposes;20                (2) an official representative of a foreign 21            government who is:22                    (A) accredited to the United States 23                Government or the Government's mission to an 24                international organization having its 25                headquarters in the United States; or26                    (B) en route to or from another country to   HB3099- 14 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1                which that noncitizen is accredited;2                (3) an official of a foreign government or 3            distinguished foreign visitor who has been so 4            designated by the Department of State;5                (4) a foreign law enforcement officer of a 6            friendly foreign government entering the United 7            States on official business; or8                (5) one who has received a waiver from the 9            Attorney General of the United States pursuant to 10            18 U.S.C. 922(y)(3);11            (xii) He or she is not a minor subject to a 12        petition filed under Section 5-520 of the Juvenile 13        Court Act of 1987 alleging that the minor is a 14        delinquent minor for the commission of an offense that 15        if committed by an adult would be a felony;16            (xiii) He or she is not an adult who had been 17        adjudicated a delinquent minor under the Juvenile 18        Court Act of 1987 for the commission of an offense that 19        if committed by an adult would be a felony;20            (xiv) He or she is a resident of the State of 21        Illinois; 22            (xv) He or she has not been adjudicated as a person 23        with a mental disability; 24            (xvi) He or she has not been involuntarily 25        admitted into a mental health facility; and 26            (xvii) He or she is not a person with a   HB3099- 15 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1        developmental disability; and 2        (3) Upon request by the Illinois State Police, sign a 3    release on a form prescribed by the Illinois State Police 4    waiving any right to confidentiality and requesting the 5    disclosure to the Illinois State Police of limited mental 6    health institution admission information from another 7    state, the District of Columbia, any other territory of 8    the United States, or a foreign nation concerning the 9    applicant for the sole purpose of determining whether the 10    applicant is or was a patient in a mental health 11    institution and disqualified because of that status from 12    receiving a Firearm Owner's Identification Card. No mental 13    health care or treatment records may be requested. The 14    information received shall be destroyed within one year of 15    receipt.16    (a-5) Each applicant for a Firearm Owner's Identification 17Card who is over the age of 18 shall furnish to the Illinois 18State Police either his or her Illinois driver's license 19number or Illinois Identification Card number, except as 20provided in subsection (a-10).21    (a-10) Each applicant for a Firearm Owner's Identification 22Card, who is employed as a law enforcement officer, an armed 23security officer in Illinois, or by the United States Military 24permanently assigned in Illinois and who is not an Illinois 25resident, shall furnish to the Illinois State Police his or 26her driver's license number or state identification card   HB3099- 16 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1number from his or her state of residence. The Illinois State 2Police may adopt rules to enforce the provisions of this 3subsection (a-10).4    (a-15) If an applicant applying for a Firearm Owner's 5Identification Card moves from the residence address named in 6the application, he or she shall immediately notify in a form 7and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police of that 8change of address.9    (a-20) Each applicant for a Firearm Owner's Identification 10Card shall furnish to the Illinois State Police his or her 11photograph. An applicant who is 21 years of age or older 12seeking a religious exemption to the photograph requirement 13must furnish with the application an approved copy of United 14States Department of the Treasury Internal Revenue Service 15Form 4029. In lieu of a photograph, an applicant regardless of 16age seeking a religious exemption to the photograph 17requirement shall submit fingerprints on a form and manner 18prescribed by the Illinois State Police with his or her 19application. 20    (a-25) Beginning January 1, 2023, each applicant for the 21issuance of a Firearm Owner's Identification Card may include 22a full set of his or her fingerprints in electronic format to 23the Illinois State Police, unless the applicant has previously 24provided a full set of his or her fingerprints to the Illinois 25State Police under this Act or the Firearm Concealed Carry 26Act.  HB3099- 17 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1    The fingerprints must be transmitted through a live scan 2fingerprint vendor licensed by the Department of Financial and 3Professional Regulation. The fingerprints shall be checked 4against the fingerprint records now and hereafter filed in the 5Illinois State Police and Federal Bureau of Investigation 6criminal history records databases, including all available 7State and local criminal history record information files.8    The Illinois State Police shall charge applicants a 9one-time fee for conducting the criminal history record check, 10which shall be deposited into the State Police Services Fund 11and shall not exceed the actual cost of the State and national 12criminal history record check.13    (a-26) The Illinois State Police shall research, explore, 14and report to the General Assembly by January 1, 2022 on the 15feasibility of permitting voluntarily submitted fingerprints 16obtained for purposes other than Firearm Owner's 17Identification Card enforcement that are contained in the 18Illinois State Police database for purposes of this Act. 19    (b) Each application form shall include the following 20statement printed in bold type: "Warning: Entering false 21information on an application for a Firearm Owner's 22Identification Card is punishable as a Class 2 felony in 23accordance with subsection (d-5) of Section 14 of the Firearm 24Owners Identification Card Act.".25    (c) Upon such written consent, pursuant to Section 4, 26paragraph (a)(2)(i), the parent or legal guardian giving the   HB3099- 18 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1consent shall be liable for any damages resulting from the 2applicant's use of firearms or firearm ammunition.3(Source: P.A. 101-80, eff. 7-12-19; 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 4102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1030, eff. 55-27-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23.) 6    (430 ILCS 65/8)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-8)7    Sec. 8. Grounds for denial and revocation. The Illinois 8State Police has authority to deny an application for or to 9revoke and seize a Firearm Owner's Identification Card 10previously issued under this Act only if the Illinois State 11Police finds that the applicant or the person to whom such card 12was issued is or was at the time of issuance:13        (a) A person under 21 years of age who has been 14    convicted of a misdemeanor other than a traffic offense or 15    adjudged delinquent;16        (b) This subsection (b) applies through the 180th day 17    following July 12, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 18    101-80). A person under 21 years of age who does not have 19    the written consent of his parent or guardian to acquire 20    and possess firearms and firearm ammunition, or whose 21    parent or guardian has revoked such written consent, or 22    where such parent or guardian does not qualify to have a 23    Firearm Owner's Identification Card;24        (b-5) This subsection (b-5) applies on and after the 25    181st day following July 12, 2019 (the effective date of   HB3099- 19 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1    Public Act 101-80). A person under 21 years of age who is 2    not an active duty member of the United States Armed 3    Forces or the Illinois National Guard and does not have 4    the written consent of his or her parent or guardian to 5    acquire and possess firearms and firearm ammunition, or 6    whose parent or guardian has revoked such written consent, 7    or where such parent or guardian does not qualify to have a 8    Firearm Owner's Identification Card; 9        (c) A person convicted of a felony under the laws of 10    this or any other jurisdiction, unless the offense was not 11    a forcible felony and the person has received a 12    certificate of relief from disabilities pursuant to 13    subsections (g) and (g-5) of Section 5-5.5-15 of the 14    Unified Code of Corrections;15        (d) A person addicted to narcotics;16        (e) A person who has been a patient of a mental health 17    facility within the past 5 years or a person who has been a 18    patient in a mental health facility more than 5 years ago 19    who has not received the certification required under 20    subsection (u) of this Section. An active law enforcement 21    officer employed by a unit of government or a Department 22    of Corrections employee authorized to possess firearms who 23    is denied, revoked, or has his or her Firearm Owner's 24    Identification Card seized under this subsection (e) may 25    obtain relief as described in subsection (c-5) of Section 26    10 of this Act if the officer or employee did not act in a   HB3099- 20 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1    manner threatening to the officer or employee, another 2    person, or the public as determined by the treating 3    clinical psychologist or physician, and the officer or 4    employee seeks mental health treatment;5        (f) A person whose mental condition is of such a 6    nature that it poses a clear and present danger to the 7    applicant, any other person or persons, or the community;8        (g) A person who has an intellectual disability;9        (h) A person who intentionally makes a false statement 10    in the Firearm Owner's Identification Card application or 11    endorsement affidavit;12        (i) A noncitizen who is unlawfully present in the 13    United States under the laws of the United States;14        (i-5) A noncitizen who has been admitted to the United 15    States under a non-immigrant visa (as that term is defined 16    in Section 101(a)(26) of the Immigration and Nationality 17    Act (8 U.S.C. 1101(a)(26))), except that this subsection 18    (i-5) does not apply to any noncitizen who has been 19    lawfully admitted to the United States under a 20    non-immigrant visa if that noncitizen is:21            (1) admitted to the United States for lawful 22        hunting or sporting purposes;23            (2) an official representative of a foreign 24        government who is:25                (A) accredited to the United States Government 26            or the Government's mission to an international   HB3099- 21 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1            organization having its headquarters in the United 2            States; or3                (B) en route to or from another country to 4            which that noncitizen is accredited;5            (3) an official of a foreign government or 6        distinguished foreign visitor who has been so 7        designated by the Department of State;8            (4) a foreign law enforcement officer of a 9        friendly foreign government entering the United States 10        on official business; or11            (5) one who has received a waiver from the 12        Attorney General of the United States pursuant to 18 13        U.S.C. 922(y)(3);14        (j) (Blank);15        (k) A person who has been convicted within the past 5 16    years of battery, assault, aggravated assault, violation 17    of an order of protection, or a substantially similar 18    offense in another jurisdiction, in which a firearm was 19    used or possessed;20        (l) A person who has been convicted of domestic 21    battery, aggravated domestic battery, or a substantially 22    similar offense in another jurisdiction committed before, 23    on or after January 1, 2012 (the effective date of Public 24    Act 97-158). If the applicant or person who has been 25    previously issued a Firearm Owner's Identification Card 26    under this Act knowingly and intelligently waives the   HB3099- 22 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1    right to have an offense described in this paragraph (l) 2    tried by a jury, and by guilty plea or otherwise, results 3    in a conviction for an offense in which a domestic 4    relationship is not a required element of the offense but 5    in which a determination of the applicability of 18 U.S.C. 6    922(g)(9) is made under Section 112A-11.1 of the Code of 7    Criminal Procedure of 1963, an entry by the court of a 8    judgment of conviction for that offense shall be grounds 9    for denying an application for and for revoking and 10    seizing a Firearm Owner's Identification Card previously 11    issued to the person under this Act;12        (m) (Blank);13        (n) A person who is prohibited from acquiring or 14    possessing firearms or firearm ammunition by any Illinois 15    State statute or by federal law;16        (o) A minor subject to a petition filed under Section 17    5-520 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 alleging that the 18    minor is a delinquent minor for the commission of an 19    offense that if committed by an adult would be a felony; 20        (p) An adult who had been adjudicated a delinquent 21    minor under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for the 22    commission of an offense that if committed by an adult 23    would be a felony;24        (q) A person who is not a resident of the State of 25    Illinois, except as provided in subsection (a-10) of 26    Section 4;   HB3099- 23 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1        (r) A person who has been adjudicated as a person with 2    a mental disability; 3        (s) A person who has been found to have a 4    developmental disability; 5        (t) A person involuntarily admitted into a mental 6    health facility; or 7        (u) A person who has had his or her Firearm Owner's 8    Identification Card revoked or denied under subsection (e) 9    of this Section or item (iv) of paragraph (2) of 10    subsection (a) of Section 4 of this Act because he or she 11    was a patient in a mental health facility as provided in 12    subsection (e) of this Section, shall not be permitted to 13    obtain a Firearm Owner's Identification Card, after the 14    5-year period has lapsed, unless he or she has received a 15    mental health evaluation by a physician, clinical 16    psychologist, or qualified examiner as those terms are 17    defined in the Mental Health and Developmental 18    Disabilities Code, and has received a certification that 19    he or she is not a clear and present danger to himself, 20    herself, or others. The physician, clinical psychologist, 21    or qualified examiner making the certification and his or 22    her employer shall not be held criminally, civilly, or 23    professionally liable for making or not making the 24    certification required under this subsection, except for 25    willful or wanton misconduct. This subsection does not 26    apply to a person whose firearm possession rights have   HB3099- 24 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1    been restored through administrative or judicial action 2    under Section 10 or 11 of this Act. 3    Upon revocation of a person's Firearm Owner's 4Identification Card, the Illinois State Police shall provide 5notice to the person and the person shall comply with Section 69.5 of this Act. 7(Source: P.A. 101-80, eff. 7-12-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 8102-645, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1030, eff. 95-27-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23.) 10    Section 10. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 11changing Sections 5-5-5 and 5-5.5-15 as follows: 12    (730 ILCS 5/5-5-5)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-5-5)13    Sec. 5-5-5. Loss and restoration of rights. 14    (a) Conviction and disposition shall not entail the loss 15by the defendant of any civil rights, except under this 16Section and Sections 29-6 and 29-10 of The Election Code, as 17now or hereafter amended.18    (b) A person convicted of a felony shall be ineligible to 19hold an office created by the Constitution of this State until 20the completion of his sentence.21    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person 22convicted of a felony, bribery, perjury, or other infamous 23crime for an offense committed on or after the effective date 24of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly and   HB3099- 25 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1committed while he or she was serving as a public official in 2this State is ineligible to hold any local public office or any 3office created by the Constitution of this State unless the 4person's conviction is reversed, the person is again restored 5to such rights by the terms of a pardon for the offense, the 6person has received a restoration of rights by the Governor, 7or the person's rights are otherwise restored by law.8    (c) A person sentenced to imprisonment shall lose his 9right to vote until released from imprisonment.10    (d) On completion of sentence of imprisonment or upon 11discharge from probation, conditional discharge or periodic 12imprisonment, or at any time thereafter, all license rights 13and privileges granted under the authority of this State which 14have been revoked or suspended because of conviction of an 15offense shall be restored unless the authority having 16jurisdiction of such license rights finds after investigation 17and hearing that restoration is not in the public interest. 18This paragraph (d) shall not apply to the suspension or 19revocation of a license to operate a motor vehicle under the 20Illinois Vehicle Code.21    (e) Upon a person's discharge from incarceration or 22parole, or upon a person's discharge from probation or at any 23time thereafter, the committing court may enter an order 24certifying that the sentence has been satisfactorily completed 25when the court believes it would assist in the rehabilitation 26of the person and be consistent with the public welfare. Such   HB3099- 26 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1order may be entered upon the motion of the defendant or the 2State or upon the court's own motion.3    (f) Upon entry of the order, the court shall issue to the 4person in whose favor the order has been entered a certificate 5stating that his behavior after conviction has warranted the 6issuance of the order.7    (g) This Section shall not affect the right of a defendant 8to collaterally attack his conviction or to rely on it in bar 9of subsequent proceedings for the same offense.10    (h) No application for any license specified in subsection 11(i) of this Section granted under the authority of this State 12shall be denied by reason of an eligible offender who has 13obtained a certificate of relief from disabilities, as defined 14in Article 5.5 of this Chapter, having been previously 15convicted of one or more criminal offenses, or by reason of a 16finding of lack of "good moral character" when the finding is 17based upon the fact that the applicant has previously been 18convicted of one or more criminal offenses, unless:19        (1) there is a direct relationship between one or more 20    of the previous criminal offenses and the specific license 21    sought; or22        (2) the issuance of the license would involve an 23    unreasonable risk to property or to the safety or welfare 24    of specific individuals or the general public.25    In making such a determination, the licensing agency shall 26consider the following factors:  HB3099- 27 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1        (1) the public policy of this State, as expressed in 2    Article 5.5 of this Chapter, to encourage the licensure 3    and employment of persons previously convicted of one or 4    more criminal offenses;5        (2) the specific duties and responsibilities 6    necessarily related to the license being sought;7        (3) the bearing, if any, the criminal offenses or 8    offenses for which the person was previously convicted 9    will have on his or her fitness or ability to perform one 10    or more such duties and responsibilities;11        (4) the time which has elapsed since the occurrence of 12    the criminal offense or offenses;13        (5) the age of the person at the time of occurrence of 14    the criminal offense or offenses;15        (6) the seriousness of the offense or offenses;16        (7) any information produced by the person or produced 17    on his or her behalf in regard to his or her rehabilitation 18    and good conduct, including a certificate of relief from 19    disabilities issued to the applicant, which certificate 20    shall create a presumption of rehabilitation in regard to 21    the offense or offenses specified in the certificate; and22        (8) the legitimate interest of the licensing agency in 23    protecting property, and the safety and welfare of 24    specific individuals or the general public.25    (i) A certificate of relief from disabilities shall be 26issued only for a license or certification issued under the   HB3099- 28 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1following Acts:2        (1) the Animal Welfare Act; except that a certificate 3    of relief from disabilities may not be granted to provide 4    for the issuance or restoration of a license under the 5    Animal Welfare Act for any person convicted of violating 6    Section 3, 3.01, 3.02, 3.03, 3.03-1, or 4.01 of the Humane 7    Care for Animals Act or Section 26-5 or 48-1 of the 8    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;9        (2) the Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act;10        (3) the Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair Braiding, 11    and Nail Technology Act of 1985;12        (4) the Boiler and Pressure Vessel Repairer Regulation 13    Act;14        (5) the Boxing and Full-contact Martial Arts Act;15        (6) the Illinois Certified Shorthand Reporters Act of 16    1984;17        (7) the Illinois Farm Labor Contractor Certification 18    Act;19        (8) the Registered Interior Designers Act;20        (9) the Illinois Professional Land Surveyor Act of 21    1989;22        (10) the Landscape Architecture Registration Act;23        (11) the Marriage and Family Therapy Licensing Act;24        (12) the Private Employment Agency Act;25        (13) the Professional Counselor and Clinical 26    Professional Counselor Licensing and Practice Act;  HB3099- 29 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1        (14) the Real Estate License Act of 2000;2        (15) the Illinois Roofing Industry Licensing Act;3        (16) the Professional Engineering Practice Act of 4    1989;5        (17) the Water Well and Pump Installation Contractor's 6    License Act;7        (18) the Electrologist Licensing Act; 8        (19) the Auction License Act;9        (20) the Illinois Architecture Practice Act of 1989;10        (21) the Dietitian Nutritionist Practice Act;11        (22) the Environmental Health Practitioner Licensing 12    Act;13        (23) the Funeral Directors and Embalmers Licensing 14    Code;15        (24) (blank);16        (25) the Professional Geologist Licensing Act;17        (26) the Illinois Public Accounting Act; and18        (27) the Structural Engineering Practice Act of 1989.19    (j) A person sentenced to imprisonment shall lose the 20right to use or knowingly possess any firearm. 21(Source: P.A. 102-284, eff. 8-6-21; 103-562, eff. 11-17-23.) 22    (730 ILCS 5/5-5.5-15)23    Sec. 5-5.5-15. Certificates of relief from disabilities 24issued by courts. 25    (a) Any circuit court of this State may issue a   HB3099- 30 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1certificate of relief from disabilities to an eligible 2offender for a conviction that occurred in that court if the 3court imposed the sentence. The certificate may be issued (i) 4at the time sentence is pronounced, in which case it may grant 5relief from disabilities, or (ii) at any time thereafter, in 6which case it shall apply only to disabilities.7    (b) The certificate may not be issued by the court unless 8the court is satisfied, based on clear and convincing 9evidence, that:10        (1) the person to whom it is to be granted is an 11    eligible offender, as defined in Section 5-5.5-5;12        (2) the relief to be granted by the certificate is 13    consistent with the rehabilitation of the eligible 14    offender; and15        (3) the relief to be granted by the certificate is 16    consistent with the public interest.17    (c) If a certificate of relief from disabilities is not 18issued at the time sentence is pronounced it shall only be 19issued thereafter upon verified application to the court. The 20court may, for the purpose of determining whether the 21certificate shall be issued, request the probation or court 22services department to conduct an investigation of the 23applicant. Any probation officer requested to make an 24investigation under this Section shall prepare and submit to 25the court a written report in accordance with the request.26    (d) Any court that has issued a certificate of relief from   HB3099- 31 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1disabilities may at any time issue a new certificate to 2enlarge the relief previously granted provided that the 3provisions of clauses (1) through (3) of subsection (b) of 4this Section apply to the issuance of any such new 5certificate.6    (e) Any written report submitted to the court under this 7Section is confidential and may not be made available to any 8person or public or private agency except if specifically 9required or permitted by statute or upon specific 10authorization of the court. However, it shall be made 11available by the court for examination by the applicant's 12attorney, or the applicant himself or herself, if he or she has 13no attorney. In its discretion, the court may except from 14disclosure a part or parts of the report that are not relevant 15to the granting of a certificate, or sources of information 16which have been obtained on a promise of confidentiality, or 17any other portion of the report, disclosure of which would not 18be in the interest of justice. The action of the court 19excepting information from disclosure shall be subject to 20appellate review. The court, in its discretion, may hold a 21conference in open court or in chambers to afford an applicant 22an opportunity to controvert or to comment upon any portions 23of the report. The court may also conduct a summary hearing at 24the conference on any matter relevant to the granting of the 25application and may take testimony under oath.26    As used in this subsection, "confidential" has the same   HB3099- 32 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1meaning as in paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of Section 5 of 2the Court Record and Document Accessibility Act. 3    (f) An employer is not civilly or criminally liable for an 4act or omission by an employee who has been issued a 5certificate of relief from disabilities, except for a willful 6or wanton act by the employer in hiring the employee who has 7been issued a certificate of relief from disabilities. 8    (g) All rights a person has lost under subsection (j) of 9Section 5-5-5 of the Unified Code of Corrections shall be 10eligible for restoration 5 years after the person has 11completed the person's sentence, including applicable periods 12of probation or parole. The date on which all rights are 13restored under this subsection shall be noted on a certificate 14issued by the court which shall be the same certificate issued 15under subsections (a) and (b). A conviction for a new felony 16upon the issuance of any certificate under this section shall 17render the certificate void. A person shall only be eligible 18for restoration of the person's rights under this subsection 19if:20        (1) the person has not been convicted of any other 21    felony other than convictions arising out of the same 22    occurrence or related course of events for which 23    restoration of rights is to be certified; and24        (2) the person has not been convicted of any forcible 25    felony.26    (g-5) When a certificate of relief from disabilities is   HB3099- 33 -LRB104 08126 BDA 18172 b1issued pursuant to subsection (g), the court shall:2        (1) notify the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and 3    Firearms when any person's right to use or possess any 4    firearm has been restored pursuant to this subsection; and5        (2) file a copy of the certificate with the Secretary 6    of State and the Illinois State Police.7(Source: P.A. 103-166, eff. 1-1-24.)